Hawaii statutes.
[§304A-3004] Research vessel safety
requirements. Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, prior to the
charter or use of any research or other oceangoing vessel by the research
corporation or any agent thereof, the research corporation shall ensure that
the vessel meets the research vessel standards recommended by the guidelines of
the university national oceanographic laboratory systems. [L 2006, c 75, pt of
§2]

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next